Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-2] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Ascendant" means an individual who
precedes another individual in lineage, in the direct line of ascent from the
other individual.

"Collateral" means an individual who
is related to another individual under the law of intestate succession of this
State, but who is not the other individual's ascendant or descendant.

"Descendant" means an individual who
follows another individual in lineage, in the direct line of descent from the
other individual.

"Determination of value" means an
order of a court determining the fair market value of heirs property under
section 668A-7 or 668A-11 or adopting the valuation of the property agreed to
by all cotenants.

"Heirs property" means real property
held in tenancy in common that satisfies all the following requirements as of
the filing of an action for partition:

(1) There is no agreement in a record binding all the
cotenants that governs the partition of the property;

(2) One or more of the cotenants acquired title from
a relative, whether living or deceased; and

(3) Any of the following applies:

(A) Twenty per cent or more of the interests
are held by cotenants who are relatives;

(B) Twenty per cent or more of the interests
are held by an individual who acquired title from a relative, whether living or
deceased; or

(C) Twenty per cent or more of the cotenants
are relatives.

"Partition by sale" means a
court-ordered sale of the entire heirs property, whether by auction, sealed
bids, or open-market sale conducted under section 668A-11.

"Partition in kind" means the
division of heirs property into physically distinct and separately titled
parcels.

"Record" means information that is
inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other
medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

"Relative" means an ascendant,
descendant, or collateral or an individual otherwise related to another
individual by blood, marriage, adoption, or law of this State other than this
chapter. [L 2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next